South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3266.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 75, Title 38 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 38-75-70.  An insurer may not deny a claim arising from a leak on the basis of the leak occurring over an extended period of time unless the insured had actual knowledge of the leak and failed to undertake actions to repair or replace the source of the leak. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----